Maryland, session 2026, HB0212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
12–110.
(a) (1) The Administration may take possession of any certificate of title,
registration card, permit, license, or registration plate:
[(1)] (I) That is fictitious;
[(2)] (II) That is issued by it and that:
[(i)] 1. Has expired;
[(ii)] 2. Has been canceled, suspended, or revoked; or
[(iii)] 3. Was issued unlawfully or erroneously; or
[(3)] (III) That has been issued by another jurisdiction but is being illegally
used or displayed.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY TAKE POSSESSION OF ANY
REGISTRATION CARD OR REGISTRATION PLATE THAT WAS ISSUED BY ANOTHER
JURISDICTION BUT IS BEING USED OR DISPLAYED ON A MOTOR VEHICLE BY A
PERSON WHO HAS BEEN A RESIDENT OF THE STATE FOR MORE THAN 60 DAYS.
12–402.

HOUSE BILL 212 3
It is the policy of this State to promote and encourage the fullest possible use of its
highway system by authorizing vehicle reciprocal or proportional registration agreements,
arrangements, and declarations with other jurisdictions as to vehicles registered in this
State and in those other jurisdictions, thus contributing to the SAFETY AND THE economic
and social development and growth of this State.
12–411.1.
(A) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY MAKE AN AGREEMENT, AN ARRANGEMENT,
OR A DECLARATION WITH THE AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF ANY OTHER
JURISDICTION TO PROVIDE FOR RECIPROCAL ENFORCEMENT OF VIOLATIONS
RECORDED BY TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEMS AND SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS BETWEEN THIS STATE AND THE OTHER JURISDICTION.
(B) AN AGREEMENT, AN ARRANGEMENT, OR A DECLARATION MADE UNDER
THIS SECTION MAY AUTHORIZE THE ADMINISTRATION TO REFUSE TO REGISTER OR
REREGISTER A MOTOR VEHICLE.
13–402.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or elsewhere in the
Maryland Vehicle Law, each motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer driven on
a highway shall be registered under this subtitle.
(2) If a motor vehicle required to be registered under this subtitle is not
registered, a person may not park the unregistered motor vehicle on any:
(i) Public alley, street, or highway; or
(ii) Private property used by the public in general, including parking
lots of shopping centers, condominiums, apartments, or town house developments.
(3) The provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection do not apply to a
motor vehicle that is exempt from registration under this section or § 13–402.1 of this
subtitle.
(c) Registration under this subtitle is not required for:
(7) A vehicle owned by a new resident of this State during the first 60 days
of residency provided the vehicle displays valid registration issued by the jurisdiction of the
resident’s former domicile;
15–606.
(a) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may not
make any material misrepresentation on any form of the Administration.

HOUSE BILL 212
(b) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may not
misrepresent any material fact in obtaining a license.
(c) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may not
willfully fail to notify the Administration of any change in the ownership, management,
name, or location of the business conducted under the license.
(d) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may not
fail to account for and remit to the Administration any fees received by him for any
certificates of title, registrations, drivers’ licenses, certified copies of records, or other
related documents.
(e) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may not
conduct any title service agency business with or through any person required to be licensed
under this title if he knows that the person is not licensed.
(F) A TITLE SERVICE AGENT OR AN AGENT OR EMPLOYEE OF A TITLE
SERVICE AGENT MAY NOT SELL OR OFFER FOR SALE A MOTOR VEHICLE
REGISTRATION ISSUED BY ANOTHER JURISDICTION TO A RESIDENT OF THIS STATE.
[(f)] (G) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may
not willfully violate any provision of the Maryland Vehicle Law that relates to the business
of a title service agent.
[(g)] (H) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may
not willfully fail to comply with any rule, regulation, or lawful order adopted by the
Administration under this title.
26–301.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, any State agency authorized by law
and any political subdivision of this State may adopt ordinances or regulations that:
(1) Regulate the parking of vehicles;
(2) Provide for the impounding of vehicles parked in violation of the
ordinances or regulations;
(3) Regulate the towing of vehicles from publicly owned and privately
owned parking lots; and
(4) Provide for the issuance of a citation by an officer for a violation of an
ordinance or regulation that is adopted under this section.

HOUSE BILL 212 5
(B–1) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY PROVIDED FOR IN THE
MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW, IF THE ADMINISTRATION HAS PROBABLE CAUSE TO
BELIEVE THAT A MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER IS A RESIDENT OF THE STATE AND HAS
FAILED TO PROPERLY REGISTER THE MOTOR VEHICLE WITH THE ADMINISTRATION
AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ISSUED BY THE ADMINISTRATION ON
THE MOTOR VEHICLE, THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER IS SUBJECT TO A WARNING
REQUIRING THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER, WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER ISSUANCE OF THE
WARNING, TO:
(I) PROPERLY REGISTER THE MOTOR VEHICLE WITH THE
ADMINISTRATION AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ISSUED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION ON THE MOTOR VEHICLE; OR
(II) PROVIDE PROOF ACCEPTABLE TO THE ADMINISTRATION
THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT REQUIRED TO BE REGISTERED IN THE STATE.
(2) (I) IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER PROVIDES PROOF
ACCEPTABLE TO THE ADMINISTRATION THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT
REQUIRED TO BE REGISTERED IN THE STATE, IF APPLICABLE AS DETERMINED BY
THE ADMINISTRATION, THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER SHALL OBTAIN AND DISPLAY
ON THE MOTOR VEHICLE A NONRESIDENT PERMIT ISSUED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(II) IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER FAILS, WITHIN 60 DAYS
AFTER ISSUANCE OF A WARNING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, TO PROPERLY REGISTER
THE MOTOR VEHICLE AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ON THE MOTOR
VEHICLE OR PROVIDE PROOF ACCEPTABLE TO THE ADMINISTRATION THAT
REGISTRATION IN THE STATE IS NOT REQUIRED, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL
BEGIN TO ASSESS A CIVIL FINE AGAINST THE MOTOR VEHICLE OF $7 PER DAY FOR
UP TO 60 DAYS OR UNTIL THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS PROPERLY REGISTERED AND
DISPLAYING VALID REGISTRATION PLATES OR THE ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES
THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION IN THE STATE,
WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST.
(3) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL NOTIFY THE APPROPRIATE
LOCAL JURISDICTION IF A MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER FAILS, WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER
ISSUANCE OF A WARNING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, TO PROPERLY REGISTER THE
MOTOR VEHICLE AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ON THE MOTOR
VEHICLE OR SATISFY THE ADMINISTRATION THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT
SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION IN THE STATE.
(II) THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY STATE’S ATTORNEY ATTORNEY
MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION IN REM AGAINST A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR WHICH THE
MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER FAILS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO PROPERLY REGISTER

HOUSE BILL 212
AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES OR TO SATISFY THE ADMINISTRATION
THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION IN THE STATE.
(III) IN A CIVIL ACTION IN REM BROUGHT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY STATE’S ATTORNEY ATTORNEY MAY SEEK
IMMOBILIZATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE BY TOWING OR REMOVAL AND
IMPOUNDMENT OR BY BOOTING.
(4) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL SUSPEND THE DRIVER’S
LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IN THE STATE OF ANY MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER
WHO FAILS, WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER ISSUANCE OF A WARNING UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, TO PROPERLY REGISTER THE MOTOR VEHICLE AND DISPLAY VALID
REGISTRATION PLATES ON THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR SATISFY THE ADMINISTRATION
THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION IN THE STATE.
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REINSTATE A MOTOR
VEHICLE OWNER’S DRIVER’S LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IN THE STATE IF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER PROPERLY REGISTERS THE MOTOR VEHICLE AND
DISPLAYS VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ON THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR SATISFIES THE
ADMINISTRATION THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION IN
THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.